Wyoming statutes. Title 31 Motor Vehicles
Article 1. Certificates of Title
§ 31-2-106.
Definitions.

As used in W.S.

31-2-106

through

31-2-112

:

“Flood vehicle” means any motor vehicle that has been submerged in water to the point that rising water has reached over the door sill and has entered into the passenger or trunk compartment of the vehicle and the actual dollar amount of the damage would not cause the vehicle to be titled as a salvage vehicle. Disclosure that a motor vehicle has become a flood vehicle shall be made at the time of transfer of ownership and the next certificate of title issued after the transfer shall be branded with the word “flood”;

“Certificate of title, branded salvage” means a motor vehicle ownership document issued in this state to the owner of a salvage vehicle conspicuously branded with the word “salvage” across the front of the certificate;

“Rebuilt title” means the certificate of title issued in this state to the owner of a rebuilt salvage vehicle conspicuously branded “rebuilt” across the front of the certificate of title;

“Rebuilt salvage vehicle” means any motor vehicle which was previously issued a certificate of title branded “salvage” and has a decal stating “rebuilt salvage vehicle” affixed as required by W.S. 31-2-108(d);

“Salvage vehicle” means any motor vehicle which has been wrecked, destroyed or damaged to the extent that it has been declared a total loss by the insurance company or, in the event an insurance company is not involved in the settlement of the claim, the total estimated or actual cost of parts and labor to rebuild or reconstruct the motor vehicle to its pre-accident condition exceeds seventy-five percent (75%) of the actual retail cash value of the motor vehicle, as set forth in the most current edition of any nationally recognized automotive appraisal guide or other source approved by the Wyoming insurance department. The value of repair parts for purposes of this paragraph shall be determined by using the current cost of the repair parts to be used in the repair. The labor cost of repairs for purposes of this paragraph shall be computed by using the hourly labor rate and time allocations that are reasonable and customary in the automobile repair industry in the community where the repairs are to be performed;

“Junk vehicle certificate of title” means the certificate of title issued in this state pursuant to W.S.

31-2-111

conspicuously branded “junk” across the front of the certificate of title;

“Glider kit vehicle” means every large truck manufactured from a kit manufactured by a manufacturer of large trucks that consists of a frame, a cab complete with wiring and instruments, fenders, hood and front axles, and consists of one (1) or more additional major components including an engine, transmission, rear axles, wheels and tires.

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 72, § 1; 2003, ch. 31, § 1; 2016 ch. 109, § 2, effective July 1, 2016; 2018 ch. 129, § 2, effective July 1, 2018.

The 2016 amendment,

effective July 1, 2016, substituted “31-2-111” for “32-2-110” in the introductory language of (a), and added (a)(vi).

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, in (a), substituted “31-2-112” for “31-2-111”; and added (a)(vii).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 31-2-107.
Titles for damaged vehicles; return of certificate of title and registration for damaged vehicle; replacement title and registration.

When a motor vehicle is declared a total loss by the insurance company or, in the event an insurance company is not involved in the settlement of the claim, sustains damage in an amount exceeding seventy-five percent (75%) of its actual retail cash value, as set forth in any current edition of a nationally recognized automotive appraisal guide or other source approved by the Wyoming insurance department, the owner or insurance company, if it obtains ownership of the vehicle through transfer of title as a result of a settlement of an insurance claim, shall forward the properly endorsed certificate of title to the office of the county clerk that issued the certificate of title together with an application for a certificate of title branded salvage and payment of the fee required under W.S. 31-3-102(a)(vii) to obtain a properly branded certificate of title. For purposes of this section, a certificate of title endorsed by an electronic signature shall constitute a properly endorsed certificate of title, which need not be notarized. When any vehicle accident report is required under chapter 5, article 11 of this title, the investigating officer shall provide written notice to the owner or operator of the vehicle of the requirements under this section.

Upon receipt of a certificate of title under subsection (a) of this section, the county clerk shall issue a certificate of title branded “salvage” to the legal owner.

Repealed by Laws 2009, ch. 16, § 4.

This section shall not apply to motor vehicles with more than eight (8) years of service except any vehicle that was previously issued a title from any state that bore any word or symbol signifying that the vehicle was “salvage”, “unrebuildable”, “parts only”, “scrap”, “junk”, “nonrepairable”, “reconstructed”, “rebuilt” or any other symbol or word of like kind, or that it has been damaged by flood, shall obtain a Wyoming title with the prior brand or any other information concerning the motor vehicle status, carried forward on any subsequent Wyoming title regardless of years of service.

This section shall not apply to a commercial vehicle or a commercial vehicle combination used, designed or maintained for transportation of persons for hire, compensation or profit, or designed or used primarily for the transportation of property for gain or profit including:

A power unit having two (2) axles and a gross vehicle weight or registered gross vehicle weight exceeding twenty-six thousand (26,000) pounds;

A power unit having three (3) or more axles regardless of weight, or which is used in combination when the weight of the combination exceeds twenty-six thousand (26,000) pounds gross vehicle weight.

If the owner of a motor vehicle retains the vehicle upon a settlement with an insurance company, and the vehicle has incurred damage requiring the vehicle to be issued a certificate of title branded “nonrepairable” or “salvage”, the owner shall apply for the certificate of title in his own name with the applicable brand displayed on the certificate of title before the vehicle is commercially repaired or ownership of the vehicle is transferred.

If an insurance company is not involved in a damage settlement involving a salvage vehicle, the motor vehicle owner shall apply for a certificate of title branded “salvage”, before the vehicle is commercially repaired or ownership of the vehicle is transferred.

If a leased motor vehicle incurs damage requiring the vehicle to be issued a certificate of title branded “salvage”, the lessor shall apply for a properly branded certificate of title after being notified by the lessee that the vehicle has been damaged. The lessee of the vehicle shall inform the lessor that the leased vehicle has been damaged within thirty (30) days after the occurrence of the damage.

Any person acquiring ownership of a damaged motor vehicle that meets the definition of a salvage vehicle for which a certificate of title branded “salvage” has not been issued shall apply for a certificate of title before the vehicle is further transferred.

A seller of a motor vehicle that becomes a flood vehicle shall, at or prior to the time of transfer of ownership, give the buyer a written notice that the vehicle is a flood vehicle. At the time of the next application for certificate of title for the vehicle, disclosure of the flood status shall be provided to the county clerk with the properly assigned title and the word “flood” shall be conspicuously branded across the front of the new title.

In the case of a leased motor vehicle, the lessee, within thirty (30) days of the occurrence of the event that caused the vehicle to become a flood vehicle, shall give the lessor written disclosure that the vehicle is a flood vehicle.

Any vehicle that is titled pursuant to this section may be reregistered if the owner complies with the provisions of this section and W.S.

31-2-108

. Any vehicle branded “salvage” as a result of hail or theft with no damage, other than cosmetic, or vehicles titled “rebuilt” or “reconstructed” by any other state and that brand is carried forward on a Wyoming title, are not required to go through the rebuilt title process and may be reregistered pursuant to this act after obtaining a Wyoming title branded "salvage" or "rebuilt", as applicable.

If an insurance company is unable to obtain a properly endorsed certificate of title within thirty (30) days of payment of damages in a claim settlement involving transfer of a salvage vehicle to the insurance company, the insurance company, an occupational licensee of the department authorized by the insurance company or a salvage pool authorized by the insurance company may request the county clerk issue a certificate of title branded salvage for the vehicle. The request shall be submitted on a form provided by the office of the county clerk and signed under penalty of perjury. The request shall include and document evidence that the insurance company has paid a claim on the vehicle and has made at least two (2) written attempts to obtain the properly endorsed certificate of title at the last known address of the owner of the vehicle. The request shall also include a disclosure of any and all security interests, liens or encumbrances that are known to the insurance company and that are outstanding against the vehicle.

The county clerk, upon receipt of a request described in subsection (o) of this section and payment of the fee required under W.S. 31-3-102(a)(vii), shall issue a certificate of title branded salvage for the vehicle to the requesting insurance company, an occupational licensee of the department authorized by the insurance company or a salvage pool authorized by the insurance company. Any such salvage title issued by the county clerk shall reflect all liens of record that have not been released.

As used in this section, “electronic signature” means an electronic sound, symbol or process attached to or logically associated with a document and executed or adopted by a person with the intent to sign the document.

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 72, § 1; 2003, ch. 31, § 1; 2004, ch. 130, § 1; 2009, ch. 16, §§ 2, 4; 2017 ch. 107, § 1, effective July 1, 2017; 2017 ch. 172, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

The 2004 amendment,

in (a), substituted “W.S. 31-3-102(a)(vii)” for “W.S. 31-2-102(a)(vii).”

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 19, 2004.

The 2009 amendment,

effective January 1, 2010, repealed former (c) pertaining to rebuilt damaged vehicle, certificate of title and requirements under W.S.

31-2-201

; added the exception in (d); and added (n).

The 2017 amendments. —

The first
2017 amendment, by ch. 107, § 1, effective July 1, 2017, in (a), added “For purposes of this section, a certificate of title endorsed by an electronic signature shall constitute a properly endorsed certificate of title, which need not be notarized”; in (d), substituted “regardless” for “irregardless”; and added (o) through (q).

The second
2017 amendment, by ch. 172, § 1, effective July 1, 2017, made a stylistic change.

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) or (l) in this section as it appears in the printed act.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 31-1-101(a)(xxii).

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

§ 31-2-108.
Rebuilt salvage vehicles; titles; requirements.

Repealed by Laws 2009, ch. 16, § 4.

The certificate of title and the rebuilt salvage decal stating “rebuilt salvage vehicle” shall meet security standards minimizing the opportunity for fraud.

A motor vehicle owner submitting an application for a rebuilt salvage vehicle decal shall be required to provide a completed document approved by the department identifying the vehicle’s damage prior to being repaired, a copy of the original certificate of title branded "salvage" and the name and address of the person who repaired or rebuilt the vehicle. The owner shall also include an affirmation that the information in the declaration is complete and accurate and, to the knowledge of the declarant, no stolen parts were used during the rebuilding. Vehicles for which the certificate of title issued by another jurisdiction is clearly branded or declared as “salvage” due to hail or theft with no damage, other than cosmetic, or vehicles titled “rebuilt” or “reconstructed” by any other state and the brand is carried forward on a Wyoming title, are not required to go through the rebuilt title process for registration purposes and may be reregistered pursuant to this act after obtaining a Wyoming title branded "salvage" or "rebuilt" as applicable, or in the case of a vehicle damaged by hail or theft with no damage, other than cosmetic, by submitting to the county clerk a statement from a properly licensed Wyoming vehicle dealer or a licensed insurance adjuster that the damage is cosmetic only.

After the owner of a motor vehicle for which a certificate of title branded “salvage” has been issued pursuant to this act, provides the information required under subsection (c) of this section to the department, the department shall provide to the owner a secure decal which shall comply with the permanency requirements of the department, stating “rebuilt salvage vehicle”. The owner shall apply the decal to the driver’s door jamb of the vehicle prior to having the vehicle inspected by a Wyoming law enforcement officer for the vehicle identification number and to ensure the decal has been properly affixed. On a motorcycle, the owner shall apply the decal opposite the vehicle identification number on the fork crown in a manner that does not obscure the vehicle identification number, prior to having the motorcycle inspected by a Wyoming law enforcement officer for the vehicle identification number and to ensure the decal has been properly affixed. The owner shall pay the fee specified in W.S. 31-3-102(b) for the inspection.

The owner of a motor vehicle for which a certificate of title branded “salvage” has been issued may apply for a certificate of title branded “rebuilt” by presenting to the county clerk the certificate of title, properly assigned, if applicable, together with the department certificate signed by a Wyoming law enforcement officer who has inspected the vehicle for the vehicle identification number and to ensure the decal required under subsection (d) of this section has been properly affixed. Upon proper application and payment of fees for a certificate of title as provided under W.S. 31-3-102(a)(vii), a certificate of title branded “rebuilt” shall be issued to the owner.

through (n) Repealed by Laws 2003, ch. 31, § 2.

If a damaged vehicle is rebuilt and the owner is issued a certificate of title branded “rebuilt”, the owner shall register the vehicle as required under W.S.

31-2-201

, unless the owner is a licensed vehicle dealer under chapter 16 of this title and the vehicle was rebuilt for resale to the public. If the person registering the rebuilt vehicle is the person under whose name the vehicle was previously registered and the annual registration year for the vehicle prior to being damaged has not expired at the time of application under this section, a credit shall be issued for the remainder of the current annual registration year for the vehicle to be applied against any registration fees due for registration of the vehicle for the same period.

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 72, § 1; 2003, ch. 31, §§ 1, 2; 2009, ch. 16, §§ 2, 4.

The 2009 amendment,

effective January 1, 2010, repealed former (a), which read: “For any motor vehicle, the ownership of which is transferred on or after December 31, 2001, the certificate of title shall contain an appropriate notice whenever records readily accessible to the state indicate that the motor vehicle was previously issued a title that bore any word or symbol signifying that the vehicle was ‘salvage’, ‘unrebuildable’, ‘parts only’, ‘scrap’, ‘junk’, ‘nonrepairable’, ‘reconstructed’, ‘rebuilt’ or any other symbol or word of like kind, or that it has been damaged by flood. Any information concerning a motor vehicle's status shall also be conveyed on any subsequent title issued for the vehicle by this state, including a duplicate or replacement title”; added the last sentence in (c); inserted “pursuant to this act” in (d); and added (o).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (o) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 31-1-101(a)(xxii).

§ 31-2-109.
Disclosure requirements.

When any dealer in this state or motor vehicle owner who is not a dealer knowingly offers for sale or trade a motor vehicle which carries a title branded pursuant to this article, the dealer or owner shall disclose on a form prescribed by the department to any prospective purchaser, prior to sale or trade, the nature of the title brand.

The notification form to be prescribed by the department shall have a statement indicating the buyer has been provided notice of the brand on the title. The seller shall require the buyer to sign the notification form prior to completing a sales transaction on a motor vehicle that carries a branded title. The seller shall retain a copy of the signed notification form.

Failure of the seller to procure the buyer’s acknowledgement signature shall render the sale voidable at the election of the buyer. The election to render the sale voidable shall be in writing and delivered to the seller not later than thirty (30) days after the certificate of title is issued in the buyer’s name.

Nothing in this act shall prevent the buyer from voiding the sale if there is evidence that the buyer failed to receive the branded title, or a copy of the branded title, or any other notification indicating the title bore any brand at the time of purchase, regardless of when the title was issued in the buyer’s name. The election to render the sale voidable shall be in writing and delivered to the seller not later than thirty (30) days after the buyer first receives knowledge that the title carries a brand. This paragraph shall apply only if there is evidence that the seller knowingly failed to notify the buyer with the intent to defraud the buyer.

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 72, § 1; 2009, ch. 16, § 2.

The 2009 amendment,

effective January 1, 2010, added (d).

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 31-1-101(a)(xxii).

§ 31-2-110.
Violations; penalties.

Any dealer or a person holding legal certificate of title to a motor vehicle who fails to obtain a proper certificate of title for a salvage vehicle as required under W.S.

31-2-107

within thirty (30) days of the receipt of the transferor’s correctly endorsed title is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00), imprisonment for not more than six (6) months, or both.

Any dealer or a person who holds legal certificate of title to a nonrepairable, rebuilt salvage or flood vehicle who knowingly fails to disclose to a potential buyer that the vehicle being sold is a nonrepairable, rebuilt salvage or flood vehicle is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00), imprisonment for not more than six (6) months, or both. A second or subsequent violation under this subsection shall be subject to a fine of not more than one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500.00), imprisonment for not more than one (1) year, or both. In addition, if a dealer is convicted of a second or subsequent violation under this subsection within two (2) years, he may be subject to an injunction. The department or the district attorney of the county in which the violation occurred may petition the court for an injunction to prohibit the dealer from selling vehicles in this state for a period of not more than one (1) year.

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 72, § 1; 2003, ch. 31, § 1.

§ 31-2-111.
Towing and recovery carrier junk vehicle certificate of title.

The county clerk of any one (1) of the counties of Wyoming may issue a junk vehicle certificate of title for a junk vehicle, as defined in W.S. 31-13-101(a)(xi) containing the following notation conspicuously displayed on the face of the certificate: “junk” if the applicant for the junk vehicle certificate of title is a person owning or acting on behalf of an establishment for towing and recovery services and the applicant submits an affidavit on a form prescribed by the department. The affidavit shall be signed and sworn before a notarial officer and shall contain:

A copy of the itemized tow bill or order containing a complete description of the vehicle, including license plate number and state indication, make, year, model, vehicle identification number, and the date, time and place of towing and the current location of the vehicle;

A current statement by a Wyoming law enforcement officer made after the date the vehicle was towed that certifies the vehicle identification number on the vehicle has been inspected, the inspection occurred in Wyoming and the correct vehicle identification number is displayed on the vehicle;

A title search report completed by the department that discloses the name of the owner and any lienholders of record, if discovered through reasonable efforts, and a statement disclosing any security interest, lien or encumbrance outstanding against the vehicle which is known to the applicant;

A copy of the written notice issued pursuant to W.S. 31-13-104(g)(iii), including a copy of the receipt evidencing the notice was sent by certified mail or a copy of the written notice issued pursuant to W.S. 31-13-101(a)(x)(D);

A photograph of the vehicle; and

A statement of the fair market value of the vehicle completed by an independent and disinterested licensed Wyoming vehicle dealer.

The owner, lienholder or the owner’s or lienholder’s insurance provider of the vehicle may reclaim the junk vehicle from the establishment for towing and recovery services by paying the charges of towing, storage and notice within thirty (30) days of the postmarked date on the notice issued pursuant to W.S. 31-13-104(g)(iii) or within ten (10) days of receipt of the notice issued pursuant to W.S. 31-13-101(a)(x)(D).

Any junk vehicle certificate of title issued under subsection (a) of this section shall be:

Branded “junk” by the county clerk; and

Used by the recipient only to transfer ownership of a vehicle to a storage and disposal facility licensed under W.S.

31-13-114

.

After a junk vehicle certificate of title is issued to a person owning or acting on behalf of an establishment for towing and recovery services under subsection (a) of this section, the former owner and any lienholder or person entitled to possession of the vehicle has no further right, title, claim or interest in or to the vehicle or its contents, and all liens, encumbrances and security interests are extinguished.

An owner or agent of an establishment for towing and recovery services may apply for a junk certificate of title in accordance with this section for a vehicle that is wrecked, damaged, disabled or apparently inoperable, has a fair market value of less than two thousand dollars ($2,000.00) and is subject to a storage lien under W.S.

29-7-101

through W.S.

29-7-106

, provided:

The towing and recovery services owner or agent provides a copy of the written notice pursuant to W.S. 29-7-105(b), including evidence the notice was sent by certified mail, in lieu of a copy of the notice required in paragraph (a)(iv) of this section; and

Within thirty (30) days of the postmarked date on the notice issued pursuant to W.S. 29-7-105(b), the vehicle’s owner, a lienholder or the owner’s or lienholder’s insurance provider fails to reclaim the junk vehicle subject to a storage lien from the establishment for towing and recovery services by paying the charges of towing, storage and notice.

History.

2016 ch. 109, § 1, effective July 1, 2016; 2021 ch. 105, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2021 amendment

, effective July 1, 2021, added (e).

Effective date. —

Laws 2016 ch. 109, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2016. Approved March 11, 2016.

§ 31-2-112.
Glider kit vehicle certificate of title.

Any county clerk may issue a glider kit vehicle certificate of title for a glider kit vehicle, as defined in W.S. 31-2-106(a)(vii), containing the following notation “glider kit” conspicuously branded on the face of the certificate.

Applications for a glider kit vehicle certificate of title shall contain or be accompanied by:

The name and address of the owner, the manner in which the ownership interest in the vehicle is to be held and the person to whom the certificate of title is to be delivered;

A description of the vehicle including the make and model year of the body that the glider kit vehicle resembles, the vehicle identification number, type of body and motive power;

A statement from the dealer or final assembler indicating:

For glider kit vehicles completely assembled by the manufacturer:

The manufacturer’s suggested retail price (MSRP) for the completed glider kit vehicle, including the glider kit, engine, transmission, rear axles, wheels, tires and any other body, cab or mechanical component;

Certification that the glider kit vehicle was newly assembled when sold to the applicant.

For glider kit vehicles fully assembled after purchase from the manufacturer, a notarized statement of value or appraisal from the final assembler of the glider kit vehicle. The statement of value or appraisal shall include:

The value of the completed glider kit vehicle, including the glider kit, engine, transmission, rear axles, wheels, tires and any other body, cab or mechanical component;

A statement of work performed to completely assemble the glider kit vehicle, including a list of components that were refurbished.

Certification of the applicant’s ownership and any liens or encumbrances upon the glider kit vehicle;

Such other information as required by the department or county clerk, including a vehicle bill of sale, any other information required under W.S.

31-2-103

and any documentation necessary to verify proof of ownership including an affidavit for proof of ownership or any surety bond required by this act. An affidavit for proof of ownership shall be by form prescribed pursuant to W.S. 31-1-201(d) and shall be utilized by each county of this state.

The owner of a glider kit vehicle who has been issued a certificate of title under another section of this article may apply for a glider kit vehicle certificate of title under this section.

A certificate of title issued under this section shall list the model year as the model year that the body of the glider kit vehicle resembles.

For glider kit vehicle certificates of title issued under this section, the vehicle identification number that is listed on the certificate of title shall be the vehicle identification number listed on the manufacturer’s statement of origin. If the manufacturer’s statement of origin does not list a vehicle identification number, a vehicle identification number shall be assigned pursuant to W.S.

31-11-105

.

Glider kit vehicles shall be titled, registered and licensed pursuant to the provisions of this chapter and chapter 18 of this title.

History.

2018 ch. 129, § 1, effective July 1, 2018; 2019 ch. 186, § 1, effective July 1, 2019; 2019 ch. 194, § 1, effective January 1, 2020.

Effective date. —

Laws 2018, ch. 129, § 3, makes the act effective July 1, 2018.

The 2019 amendments. —

The first 2019 amendment, by ch. 186, § 1, effective July 1, 2019, in (a), substituted “W.S. 31-2-106(a)(vii)” for “W.S. 31-1-101(a)(xv)(R).”

The second 2019 amendment, by ch. 194, § 1, effective January 1, 2020, in the introductory language in (b), substituted “shall contain” for “shall be under oath and contain,” and in (b)(i), added “the manner in which the ownership interest in the vehicle is to be held.”

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2019, ch. 194, § 2, provides: “This act applies to certificates of title and bills of sale issued on or after January 1, 2020.”